Maryland, session 2025, SB0425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–283.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, by regulation, the
Department shall establish and collect a fee to be paid by a generator of coal combustion
by–products[, based on a].
– 1 –

Ch. 529 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE BASE FEE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE LESS THAN $2.30 per ton [rate] of coal combustion
by–products generated by the generator annually.
(b) The Department shall base the fees on the following factors:
(1) The total annual tonnage of coal combustion by–products that the
generator generates;
(2) The type and volume of coal combustion by–products generated by the
generator;
(3) Whether the generator uses or disposes of the coal combustion
by–products;
(4) To the extent that the coal combustion by–products are used rather
than disposed of, the types of the uses;
(5) Whether the coal combustion by–products are transported for use or
disposal out–of–state; [and]
(6) THE VOLUME OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT HAVE
BEEN DISPOSED OF AND REMAIN IN LANDFILLS OR OTHER STORAGE UNITS IN THE
STATE THAT ARE SUBJECT TO INSPECTION AND MONITORING, NOT INCLUDING COAL
COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT HAVE BEEN:
(I) ADDED TO CEMENT PRODUCTS;
(II) USED IN COAL MINE RECLAMATION; OR
(III) BENEFICIALLY REUSED IN A MANNER ACCEPTABLE TO THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(7) Other factors the Department considers appropriate.
(c) The Department may not establish or impose a fee on coal combustion
by–products that are:
(1) Beneficially used, as the Department determines; or
(2) Used for coal mine reclamation in accordance with regulations the
Department adopts or with regulations of the receiving state.
(d) Fees imposed on coal combustion by–products that are transported for use or
disposal out–of–state may not exceed 50% of the fees established for disposal in–State.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 529
(e) The fees collected by the Department under this section shall be deposited into
the Fund and used in accordance with § 9–284 of this subtitle.
(f) The fees imposed shall be set at the rate necessary to implement the purposes
set forth in § 9–284 of this subtitle.
(g) In any fiscal year, if the fee schedule established by the Department generates
revenue that exceeds the amount necessary to operate a regulatory program to control the
management of coal combustion by–products, the Department shall reduce the fees in the
following fiscal year USE THE EXCESS REVENUE TO TAKE ACTION NECESSARY TO:
(1) INCREASE THE BENEFICIAL REUSE OF COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS; AND
(2) MITIGATE HUMAN HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS DUE
TO THE RELEASE OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS FROM PRIORITY SITES.
9–291.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COORDINATING COMMITTEE” MEANS THE
STATEWIDE COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS COORDINATING COMMITTEE.
(B) THERE IS A STATEWIDE COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS
COORDINATING COMMITTEE.
(C) THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(1) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION ON
ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES;
(3) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES; AND
(4) THREE MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY, EACH WITH
TECHNICAL EXPERTISE IN ONE OF THE FOLLOWING SUBJECTS:
(I) COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS;
(II) PUBLIC HEALTH; AND
(III) WATER QUALITY.
– 3 –

Ch. 529 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE COORDINATING
COMMITTEE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM IN
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL JOINTLY PROVIDE STAFF FOR
THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COORDINATING COMMITTEE; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) BEGINNING IN 2026, MEET AT LEAST TWICE A YEAR, AT THE TIMES
AND PLACES THAT THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE DETERMINES; AND
(2) WITH RESPECT TO COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCT SITES:
(I) SHARE INFORMATION ON MONITORING RESULTS; AND
(II) DISCUSS REMEDIAL ACTION THAT IS IN PROCESS, THAT IS
STILL REQUIRED, OR BOTH.
(H) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COORDINATING COMMITTEE SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS DURING THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON
EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of the Environment shall:
(1) on or before December 1, 2025, update regulations in accordance with §
9–283 of the Environment Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2026, adopt regulations to implement:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 529
(i) the federal Steam Electric Power Generating Effluent guidelines
as adopted on May 9, 2024; and
(ii) the final rule governing legacy coal combustion residuals as
adopted on May 9 8, 2024.
(b) In adopting regulations in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(ii) (a)(2) of this
section, the Department of the Environment may amend the regulations as necessary to
protect human health and the environment in the State, including:
(1) targeting actions at specific locations where coal combustion
by–products have been used previously; and
(2) expanding the list of chemicals required to be tested beyond those
required by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency to include:
(i) arsenic;
(ii) boron;
(iii) cadmium;
(iv) hexavalent chromium;
(v) radium 226;
(vi) selenium;
(vii) vanadium; and
(viii) other chemicals as determined by the Department of the
Environment.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –